Wisconsin, session 2025, AB629.
do enact as follows:AB629,1Section 1. 114.045 of the statutes is renumbered 114.045 (2m) and amended to read:114.045 (2m) (a) No person may operate a drone, as defined in s. 941.292 (1), over a correctional institution, as defined in s. 801.02 (7) (a) 1., including any grounds of the institution, except that a person may operate a drone over an institution that is a state facility with the express authorization of the secretary of corrections or his or her designee or over an institution that is a county facility with the express authorization of the sheriff of the county or his or her designee.(b) Any person who violates sub. (1) par. (a) may be required to forfeit not more than $5,000.(c) A law enforcement officer investigating an alleged violation of sub. (1) par. (a) shall seize and transfer to the department of corrections or authority in charge of the correctional institution any photograph, motion picture, other visual representation, or data that represents a visual image that was created or recorded by a drone during an alleged violation of sub. (1) par. (a).AB629,2Section 2. 114.045 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:114.045 (1m) In this section:(a) “Drone” has the meaning given in s. 941.292 (1).(b) “Law enforcement officer” has the meaning given in s. 165.85 (2) (c).(c) “Weaponized drone” means a drone that is equipped with a taser, firearm, flamethrower, chemical, or explosive device.AB629,3Section 3. 114.045 (2m) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:114.045 (2m) (bm) Any person who violates par. (a) by use of a weaponized drone, the use of which poses a threat to public safety, is guilty of a Class H felony.AB629,4Section 4. 114.045 (3m) of the statutes is created to read:114.045 (3m) (a) Subject to par. (b), a law enforcement officer may take any of the following actions that are necessary to mitigate a credible threat that a drone poses to the safety or security of people, facilities, and assets, a venue or set of venues used for large-scale public gatherings or events, critical infrastructure, or correctional facilities:1. During the operation of the drone, detect, identify, monitor, and track the drone, without prior consent, including by means of intercept or other access of a wire communication, an oral communication, or an electronic communication used to control the drone.2. Warn the operator of the drone, including by passive or active, and direct or indirect physical, electronic, radio, and electromagnetic means, and through the use of remote identification broadcast or other means.3. Disrupt or disable control of the drone without prior consent.4. Seize or exercise control of the drone.5. Seize or otherwise confiscate the drone.6. Use reasonable force, if necessary, to disable, damage, or destroy the drone.(b) Paragraph (a) applies only to a law enforcement officer or agency that acts only as authorized by 6 USC 124n, including compliance with training, certification, equipment, and reporting requirements. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab629 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/ab629 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB629 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/AB629 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»AB629: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting